Utah statutes.
77-6-2.   Commencement of action for removal.

An action for the removal of a justice court judge or officer of a city, county, or other political subdivision of this state shall be commenced by presenting a sworn, written accusation to the district court.  The accusation may be initiated by any taxpayer, grand jury, county attorney, or district attorney for the county in which the officer was elected or appointed, or by the attorney general.



Amended by Chapter 38, 1993 General Session

